Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4004
Power of attorney is durable.

A power of attorney created
after January 1, 2013, under the Nebraska Uniform Power of Attorney Act is
durable unless it expressly provides that it is terminated by the incapacity
of the principal.

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 4.